Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.410

Rules, orders, decisions, etc.

The board may adopt rules, make specific decisions, orders, and rulings, including therein demands and findings, and take other necessary action for the implementation and enforcement of the board's duties under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 256 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 32.]